Utah statutes.
58-71-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes using or employing the services of any individual to assist a licensee in any manner not in accordance with the generally recognized practices, standards, or ethics of the profession, state law, or division rule.



Enacted by Chapter 282, 1996 General Session

